Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.243, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. Nuclear power plant; new construction prohibited; relicensing. (a) The commission may not issue a certificate of need for the constructionnew text begin , on Prairie Island,new text end ofnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a new nuclear-powered electric generating plantdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) a new facility designed to store spent nuclear fuel produced by a nuclear-powered electric generating plant other than the one in operation at Prairie Island. new text end (b) Any certificate of need for additional storage of spent nuclear fuel for a facility seeking a license extension shall address the impacts of continued operations over the period for which approval is sought. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end